extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/tests/unit/data/fullstrip.aff
# FULLSTRIP option: Hunspell can strip full words by affix rules
# see OpenOffice.org Issue #80145
# test data from Davide Prina

FULLSTRIP

SET ISO8859-15
TRY aioertnsclmdpgubzfvhàq'ACMSkBGPLxEyRTVòIODNwFéùèìjUZKHWJYQX

SFX A Y 3 # verbo andare (verb to go)
SFX A andare vado andare # io vado (I go)
SFX A andare va andare # tu vai (you go)
SFX A are iamo andare # noi andiamo (we go)
